Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Chapter 61. Mississippi Seniors and Indigents Rx Program

§ 43-61-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Mississippi Seniors and Indigents Rx Program.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 593, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 43-61-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

“Department” means the Department of Human Services.

“Program” means the Mississippi Seniors and Indigents Rx Program established in this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 593, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 43-61-5.
Legislative intent; establishment of program in Department of Human Services; Office of Aging and Adult Services to play primary role in administering program.

The Legislature finds that many low income seniors and other indigents are unaware of bona fide assistance programs that are voluntarily offered by pharmaceutical manufacturers to the elderly and underprivileged. It is the intent of the Legislature to take steps necessary to make it more widely known that such assistance is available and to make it easier for people to apply for that assistance.

The Mississippi Seniors and Indigents Rx Program is established in the Department of Human Services to help seniors and qualified indigents in accessing pharmaceutical manufacturers’ discount cards and pharmaceutical assistance programs and to provide seniors and qualified indigents with applications for those programs. The department shall coordinate the operation of the program with the Division of Medicaid, the Department of Mental Health, the State Department of Health and the State Department of Rehabilitation Services to insure that the services available under the program are maximized and that paperwork and inconvenience to the seniors and qualified indigents are minimized. The department may develop, maintain and make available an Internet-based application form to the general public and to each of those state agencies so that seniors and qualified indigents may get applications for pharmaceutical assistance programs at the local offices of any of those state agencies. The department may coordinate with pharmaceutical manufacturers to obtain program applications at no cost to the state.

The Office of Aging and Adult Services of the Department of Human Services shall play a primary role in administering the program to seniors in the same way that the office assists in administering programs of the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS).

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 593, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 43-61-7.
Assistance to seniors and indigents in accessing pharmaceutical manufacturers’ discount cards and pharmaceutical assistance programs; assistance with applications to programs.

Subject to appropriation for the program, the department may provide assistance to persons determined to be eligible for services authorized by this chapter. The assistance provided by the department may include:

Assisting seniors and qualified indigents in accessing manufacturers’ pharmaceutical assistance program applications; and

Assisting seniors and qualified indigents in applying for manufacturers’ pharmaceutical assistance programs.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 593, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 43-61-9.
Voluntary sources of funding.

The department may seek and receive voluntary monies from any sources, including federal funds and gifts, which shall be expended for the purposes specified in this chapter. The department also may accept voluntary funding in the form of grants available to build community, public sector and private sector partnerships. The department shall include within the development of the program the assistance of foundations, independent and chain community pharmacists, volunteers, state agencies, community groups, religious groups, area agencies on aging, corporations, hospitals, physicians, and any other entity that can further the intent of the program.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 593, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 43-61-11.
Annual report.

The department shall prepare and submit an annual report on the program to the Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Chairman of the Senate Public Health and Welfare Committee and the Chairman of the House Public Health and Human Services Committee. Those reports shall include the number of clients served, the number of prescriptions filled and refilled, and the value of the drugs provided.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 593, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 2004.